Hawaii statutes.
§329-123 Registration requirements. (a)
Physicians who issue written certifications shall provide, in each written
certification, the name, address, patient identification number, and other
identifying information of the qualifying patient. The department of health
shall require, in rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91, that all written
certifications comply with a designated form completed by or on behalf of a
qualifying patient. The form shall require information from the applicant,
primary caregiver, and physician as specifically required or permitted by this
chapter. The form shall require the address of the location where the
marijuana is grown and shall appear on the registry card issued by the
department of health. The certifying physician shall be required to have a
bona fide physician-patient relationship with the qualifying patient. All
current active medical marijuana permits shall be honored through their
expiration date.

(b) Qualifying patients shall register with
the department of health. The registration shall be effective until the
expiration of the certificate issued by the department of health and signed by
the physician. Every qualifying patient shall provide sufficient identifying
information to establish the personal identities of the qualifying patient and
the primary caregiver. Qualifying patients shall report changes in information
within ten working days. Every qualifying patient shall have only one primary
caregiver at any given time. The department of health shall issue to the
qualifying patient a registration certificate, and shall charge $35 per year.

(c) Primary caregivers shall register with the
department of health. Every primary caregiver shall be responsible for the
care of only one qualifying patient at any given time.

(d) Upon inquiry by a law enforcement agency,
which inquiry may be made twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, the
department of health shall immediately verify whether the subject of the
inquiry has registered with the department of health and may provide reasonable
access to the registry information for official law enforcement purposes. [L
2000, c 228, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 73, §6; am L 2013, c 178, §4; am L 2015, c
241, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next